Rhode Island statutes. Title 20 Fish and Wildlife
Chapter 5 Fish Traps

20-5-1.
Fish traps — Permit required.

It shall be unlawful for any person to set a fish trap in the public waters of the state without first obtaining a permit as provided in this chapter. For the purposes of this chapter, “fish trap” means stub and floating traps, weirs, pounds, nets, or any other equivalent contrivance or thing set on, in, or anchored to the bottom or shore used for the purpose of catching fish.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 4.

20-5-2.
Persons to whom permits issuable.

The department of environmental management may issue permits duly signed and under its seal to set or erect and maintain fish traps, as provided in this chapter, to any resident of this state or to any corporations incorporated in the state, licensed in accordance with chapter 2.1 of this title, upon payment of an additional permit fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) per trap location for the permit period prescribed by §

20-5-9

for each permit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 4.

20-5-3.
Application for permit.

Any person desiring a permit for a location for erecting a fish trap shall make application in writing to the department of environmental management in any form and giving any information that the department may require.

Each application for a location for a fish trap shall fix definitely the position of the desired location, with reference to prominent points on shore, and shall also show the dimensions of the trap and of the leader to be set in the desired location, and any other details the department may require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 4.

20-5-4.
Distance between traps — Length of trap leader.

Except as provided in §

20-5-5

, no permit shall be granted for the erection within the public waters of the state of a fish trap any part of which is less than three thousand feet (3,000´) distant from an adjoining trap, measured parallel with the general coastline at such point as determined by the department of environmental management, or for a greater length of trap and leader than two hundred eighty (280) fathoms; provided, that the department of environmental management may grant a permit for the erection of a fish trap within a lesser distance of three thousand feet (3,000´) from an adjoining trap if the parties interested agree in writing to a lesser distance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 4.

20-5-5.
Restricted locations off Rhode Island and Sakonnet River.

No permit shall be granted for the erection of a fish trap within that portion of the public waters of the state southerly of the island of Rhode Island, designated by the engineer’s office of the department of the army as available fishing areas, lying easterly of Brenton’s Reef and southerly of a line drawn from Coggeshall’s Point to Sakonnet Light, except as follows:

Permits may be granted for the erection of traps:

Southeasterly from Seal Rock, so-called, in a line on range of White Church in Saunderstown over Seal Rock to the offshore limits of the outer area designated by the engineer’s office of the department of the army; provided, that all traps on this line shall be of equal length including leaders and shall be so limited in length that permits for eight (8) traps may be granted;

Southeasterly from Flat Rock, so-called, on the easterly side of Coggeshall’s Point, in a line to the offshore limits of the inner or “summer” area designated by the engineer’s office of the department of the army;

In a line from the westerly side of Price’s Neck, so-called, southwesterly for a distance not exceeding one thousand five hundred feet (1,500´); provided, that not more than two (2) traps shall be permitted in this line;

In a line from the easterly side of Price’s Neck, so-called, southeasterly for a distance not exceeding three thousand three hundred feet (3,300´);

Southeasterly from Coggeshall’s Point in a line to the eastern limits of the outer area designated by the engineer’s office of the department of the army;

Southerly from Cormorant Rock, so-called, in a line for a distance of not exceeding seven thousand feet (7,000´);

For two (2) traps only on the line constituting the offshore limits of the outer area designated by the engineer’s office of the department of the army at a point five thousand feet (5,000´) east-southeasterly of the southeastern end of the line from Seal Rock described in subsection (1);

For two (2) traps only beginning at a point ten thousand feet (10,000’) east-southeasterly of the southeastern end of the line from Seal Rock described in subsection (1);

provided, that the traps and leaders described in subsections (7) and (8) shall extend parallel with the Seal Rock line. The provisions of §

20-5-4

shall not apply to permits for the erection of traps granted under this section with the exception of the provision in §

20-5-4

that no permits shall be granted for a greater length of trap and leader than two hundred eighty (280) fathoms, which provision shall apply to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 4.

20-5-6.
Continuity of traps.

No more than two (2) traps shall be set together in any continuous string of line, and there shall be a space of one hundred fifty (150) fathoms between two traps set within which no trap, leader, or other twine shall be placed.

No more than three (3) traps shall be set, erected, or maintained by the holder of any permit issued hereunder in a manner to be consecutively arranged in any one of the lines described in §

20-5-5

; provided, that this subsection shall not be deemed to limit the total number of traps that may be set, erected, or maintained in a line by a holder.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 4.

20-5-7.
Hook-backs in leaders.

Each leader shall be set as nearly as may be in a straight line and, with the exception of the traps permitted by §

20-5-5(7)

and (8), no bend or angle in each leader known commonly as a “hook-back” shall be permitted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-5-8.
Preference of prior occupants in permitting.

The director of environmental management shall, where there are two (2) or more applicants for permits for the same location or for locations that are less than three thousand feet (3,000´) apart, determine which applicant has continuously during the fishing season occupied the location for the longer period of years; and the applicant who shall establish a priority of location shall, if otherwise properly qualified, be entitled to receive a permit for the location.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 4.

20-5-9.
Expiration and renewal of permits.

All permits issued under this chapter shall be for a three-year period or for that portion thereof expiring on the last day of December of each third year thereafter.

On termination of any permit, the department may renew the permit by issuing a new permit in place of the permit, provided application for renewal is made within ten (10) days before the termination in a manner similar to that required for application for a permit in §

20-5-3

. Failure to apply for renewal shall operate to leave the location available for an application by any other person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 4.

20-5-10.
Exclusive right of permittee — Assignment of permit.

The holder of any permit, or the holder’s heirs, executors, administrators, successors, or assigns shall have the exclusive right to fish the location by means of a fish trap, provided that the site is, and has been, actively fished.

Any holder of a permit may, with the approval of the director of environmental management, transfer the permit to any suitable person. This approval shall be endorsed on the permit in order to become effective.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 4.

20-5-11.
Inspection of traps.

The director of environmental management shall cause an inspection, or inspections, of the fish traps permitted to be made at a proper time, or times, in each year for the purpose of determining whether the traps are located in accordance with the permit for these traps and whether the permittee is observing the rules and regulations fixed by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 4.

20-5-12.
Suspension or revocation of permit.

If, upon inspection, it appears that any trap is improperly located, or it is otherwise being used in violation of the rules and regulations fixed by the director, the director of environmental management shall immediately cause notice to be given to the holder of any permit; and if those facts are established at a hearing, the director may suspend or revoke the permit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 4.

20-5-13.
Report as to traps placed — Failure to occupy location — Removal of permit from state.

On or before the tenth day of January in each year, every person holding a permit pursuant to this chapter shall notify the department of environmental management in writing, under oath, what traps were placed under the permit during the preceding calendar year. Failure to furnish this information makes the permit null and void after that date. Failure to place a complete fish trap on a permitted location for a part of one calendar year may, in the discretion of the director of environmental management, make the permit for the fish trap null and void and the location will then become available for any suitable applicant. A permit for a fish trap location becomes null and void upon the removal of the holder from the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 4.

20-5-14.
Removal of trap on cessation of use — Closed season — Damaged or dilapidated traps.

Upon ceasing to use any fish trap as authorized, that structure shall at once be removed by the owner at the owner’s expense and to the satisfaction of the director of environmental management. Failure to remove it shall be considered sufficient grounds for prosecution of the owner for maintaining a public nuisance or for revocation of the fish trap permit. Unless otherwise specified by regulations adopted by the marine fisheries council, all fish traps authorized in this chapter shall be completely removed by or before the last day of December of each year and no fish trap shall be reset before the first day of the following March. All submerged or broken stakes must be promptly removed. Any fish trap damaged or allowed to get into a dilapidated condition will be regarded as abandoned unless promptly removed or rebuilt. Failure to do this will subject the owner to prosecution and forfeiture of the trap.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 4.

20-5-15.
Seizure of abandoned or unlawful traps — Destruction or sale.

The department may take possession of any abandoned fish trap and appurtenances; or any fish trap and appurtenances placed in a location for which no permit has been obtained; or any fish trap and appurtenances for which a permit location has been obtained but that the owner of the fish trap and appurtenances may willfully maintain in a wrong position or location; and may destroy the fish trap and appurtenances, or may dispose of them at public auction to the highest bidder, first giving notice of the time and place of sale by publishing the notice at least three (3) times a week for two (2) successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation with power to adjourn the sale from time to time, giving like notice of the adjournment; and make and execute to the purchaser at the sale a good and sufficient conveyance of all right, title, and interest in and to the fish trap and appurtenances; and to receive the proceeds of the sale and pay the proceeds into the treasury of the state; and the state controller shall draw orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of all expenses of taking possession and disposing of a fish trap and any appurtenances, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers, approved by the director of environmental management, and the general treasurer shall pay the orders out of moneys appropriated for that purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 4.

20-5-16.
Rules and regulations.

The director of environmental management, with the concurrence of the marine fisheries council, may adopt and amend any rules and regulations in reference to fish traps, permitted under this chapter, that may appear to him or her necessary for the public safety and for the proper execution of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 4.

20-5-17.
Judicial enforcement of chapter and orders.

The superior court, upon the application of the director of environmental management, shall have jurisdiction in equity to enjoin the violation of any of the provisions of this chapter and to enforce the orders of the director provided for in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-5-18.
Willful injury to traps.

Any person who willfully or maliciously cuts, removes, displaces, tampers with, or in any way damages any trap, leader, or pound set by virtue of the permit provided for by this chapter shall be imprisoned not exceeding two (2) years, or fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 4.

20-5-19.
Penalty for violations generally — Prosecution.

Every person or corporation willfully violating any of the provisions of this chapter, or any rule or regulation adopted under the authority of this chapter, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), nor less than one hundred dollars ($100), or imprisoned (in the case of a natural person) not exceeding one year, or by both punishments, in the discretion of the court. Proper proceedings for violation of any of the provisions of this chapter shall be instituted by the attorney general.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-5-20.
Appropriations and disbursements.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sums it may deem sufficient to be expended by the department of environmental management under the provisions of this chapter; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw orders upon the general treasurer for those sums that may, from time to time, be required, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the director of environmental management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-5-21.
Fish traps near Conanicut Island unlawful.

It shall be unlawful to place any fish trap, as defined in this chapter, in the public waters of this state within one mile of the shore of the Island of Conanicut and no permit for this purpose shall be granted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 4.

20-5-22.
Severability.

Each section of this chapter, and each part of each section, is hereby declared to be an independent section; and the holding of any section or sections in part or parts of sections to be void, ineffective, or unconstitutional for any cause, shall not be deemed to affect any other section or part thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.